hr-HR: Banka senzora kisika motornog vozila: Red 1; Red 2; Red 3; Red 4; Nije primjenjivo (redni motor); Nepoznato; Ostalo
ru: Банк датчика кислорода автомобиля: Ряд 1; Ряд 2; Ряд 3; Ряд 4; Неприменимо (рядный двигатель); Неизвестно; Другое
hu: Gépjármű oxigénérzékelő szenzor bank: 1. hengersor; 2. hengersor; 3. hengersor; 4. hengersor; Nem alkalmazható (soros motor); Ismeretlen; Egyéb
tr: Motorlu araç oksijen sensörü bankası: Sıra 1; Sıra 2; Sıra 3; Sıra 4; Geçerli değil (sıralı motor); Bilinmiyor; Diğer
en: Motor vehicle oxygen sensor bank: Bank 1; Bank 2; Bank 3; Bank 4; Not applicable (inline engine); Unknown; Other
zh-TW: 機動車輛含氧感知器排數: Bank 1; Bank 2; Bank 3; Bank 4; 不適用 (直列引擎); 未知; 其他
sk-SK: Sada kyslíkových senzorov pre motorové vozidlá: Rad 1; Rad 2; Rad 3; Rad 4; Neuplatňuje sa (radový motor); Neznáme; Iné
bg-BG: Банкa на кислородния сензор на моторно превозно средство: Ред 1; Ред 2; Ред 3; Ред 4; Не е приложимо (редови двигател); Неизвестно; Друго
ko: 차량용 산소 센서 뱅크: 뱅크 1; 뱅크 2; 뱅크 3; 뱅크 4; 해당 없음(인라인 엔진); 알 수 없음; 기타
pt-PT: Banco do sensor de oxigénio do veículo motorizado: Banco 1; Banco 2; Banco 3; Banco 4; Não aplicável (motor em linha); Desconhecido; Outro
lt-LT: Motorinių transporto priemonių deguonies jutiklių blokas: 1 grupė; 2 grupė; 3 grupė; 4 grupė; Netaikoma (vienaeilis variklis); Nežinoma; Kita
nb: Oksygensensorbank for motorkjøretøy: Bank 1; Bank 2; Bank 3; Bank 4; Ikke aktuelt (rekkemotor); Ukjent; Annet
sv: Lambdasond för motorfordon – bank: Bank 1; Bank 2; Bank 3; Bank 4; Ej tillämpligt (rak motor); Okänt; Övrigt
it: Bancata del sensore di ossigeno del veicolo a motore: Bancata 1; Bancata 2; Bancata 3; Bancata 4; Non applicabile (motore in linea); Sconosciuto; Altro
de: Sauerstoffsensorsonden im Kraftfahrzeug: Bank 1; Bank 2; Bank 3; Bank 4; Nicht zutreffend (Reihenmotor); Unbekannt; Sonstige
ro-RO: Banc de senzor de oxigen pentru autovehicule: Bancul 1; Bancul 2; Bancul 3; Bancul 4; Nu se aplică (motor în linie); Necunoscut; Altele
es: Banco del sensor de oxígeno del vehículo a motor: Banco 1; Banco 2; Banco 3; Banco 4; No corresponde (motor en línea); Desconocido; Otro
sl-SI: Vrstica senzorja kisika motornega vozila: Blok 1; Blok 2; Blok 3; Blok 4; Ni na voljo (vrstni motor); Neznano; Drugo
nl: Zuurstofsensorbank in motorvoertuig: Bank 1; Bank 2; Bank 3; Bank 4; Niet van toepassing (lijnmotor); Onbekend; Overig
th: ตำแหน่งเซ็นเซอร์วัดออกซิเจนสำหรับรถยนต์: แบงก์ 1; แบงก์ 2; แบงก์ 3; แบงก์ 4; ไม่สามารถใช้ได้ (เครื่องยนต์แบบแถวเรียง); ไม่ทราบ; อื่นๆ
fi: Moottoriajoneuvon happianturin ryhmä: Lohko 1; Lohko 2; Lohko 3; Lohko 4; Ei sovellu (rivimoottori); Tuntematon; Muu
fr: Ensemble de sondes à oxygène pour véhicules à moteur: Banc 1; Banc 2; Banc 3; Banc 4; Non applicable (moteur en ligne); Inconnu; Autre
ja: 自動車酸素センサーバンク: バンク1; バンク2; バンク3; バンク4; 該当なし (直列エンジン); 不明; その他
vi: Cụm cảm biến oxy của xe cơ giới: Dãy 1; Dãy 2; Dãy 3; Dãy 4; Không áp dụng (động cơ thẳng hàng); Không xác định; Khác
el: Πίνακας αισθητήρα οξυγόνου σε μηχανοκίνητο όχημα: Συστοιχία 1; Συστοιχία 2; Συστοιχία 3; Συστοιχία 4; Δεν ισχύει (εν σειρά κινητήρας); Άγνωστο; Άλλο
cs: Sada kyslíkových senzorů pro motorová vozidla: Řada válců 1; Řada válců 2; Řada válců 3; Řada válců 4; Nelze použít (řadový motor); Neznámá; Jiné
zh-CN: 机动车氧气传感器缸组: 气缸组 1; 气缸组 2; 气缸组 3; 气缸组 4; 不适用（直列发动机）; 未知; 其他
da: Lamdasensorbank til motorkøretøj: Bank 1; Bank 2; Bank 3; Bank 4; Ikke relevant (rækkemotor); Ukendt; Andet
pl: Zespół czujników tlenu do pojazdu silnikowego: Rząd 1; Rząd 2; Rząd 3; Rząd 4; Nie dotyczy (silnik rzędowy); Nieznane; Inne
pt-BR: Banco do sensor de oxigênio do motor: Banco 1; Banco 2; Banco 3; Banco 4; Não aplicável (motor em linha); Desconhecido; Outros